Illinois, session 104th, SB2290.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Commerce and Economic 5Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois 6is amended by changing Section 605-1025 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 605/605-1025)8    Sec. 605-1025. Data center investment.9    (a) The Department shall issue certificates of exemption 10from the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, the Use Tax Act, the 11Service Use Tax Act, and the Service Occupation Tax Act, all 12locally-imposed retailers' occupation taxes administered and 13collected by the Department, the Chicago non-titled Use Tax, 14and a credit certification against the taxes imposed under 15subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the Illinois Income 16Tax Act to qualifying Illinois data centers. 17    (b) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 182019, the Department shall award credits against the taxes 19imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the 20Illinois Income Tax Act as provided in Section 229 of the 21Illinois Income Tax Act. 22    (c) For purposes of this Section:23        "Data center" means a facility: (1) whose primary   SB2290- 2 -LRB104 05890 HLH 15921 b1    services are the storage, management, and processing of 2    digital data; and (2) that is used to house (i) computer 3    and network systems, including associated components such 4    as servers, network equipment and appliances, 5    telecommunications, and data storage systems, (ii) systems 6    for monitoring and managing infrastructure performance, 7    (iii) Internet-related equipment and services, (iv) data 8    communications connections, (v) environmental controls, 9    (vi) fire protection systems, and (vii) security systems 10    and services. On and after January 1, 2026, "data center" 11    also includes a quantum research facility. 12        "Qualifying Illinois data center" means a new or 13    existing data center that: 14            (1) is located in the State of Illinois; 15            (2) in the case of an existing data center, made a 16        capital investment of at least $250,000,000 17        collectively by the data center operator and the 18        tenants of the data center over the 60-month period 19        immediately prior to January 1, 2020 or committed to 20        make a capital investment of at least $250,000,000 21        over a 60-month period commencing before January 1, 22        2020 and ending after January 1, 2020; or 23            (3) in the case of a new data center, or an 24        existing data center making an upgrade, makes a 25        capital investment of at least $250,000,000 over a 26        60-month period beginning on or after January 1, 2020;   SB2290- 3 -LRB104 05890 HLH 15921 b1        and 2            (4) in the case of both existing and new data 3        centers, results in the creation of at least 20 4        full-time or full-time equivalent new jobs over a 5        period of 60 months by the data center operator and the 6        tenants of the data center, collectively, associated 7        with the operation or maintenance of the data center; 8        those jobs must have a total compensation equal to or 9        greater than 120% of the average wage paid to 10        full-time employees in the county where the data 11        center is located, as determined by the U.S. Bureau of 12        Labor Statistics; and 13            (5) within 2 years after being placed in service, 14        certifies to the Department that it is carbon neutral 15        or has attained certification under one or more of the 16        following green building standards: 17                (A) BREEAM for New Construction or BREEAM 18            In-Use; 19                (B) ENERGY STAR; 20                (C) Envision; 21                (D) ISO 50001-energy management; 22                (E) LEED for Building Design and Construction 23            or LEED for Operations and Maintenance; 24                (F) Green Globes for New Construction or Green 25            Globes for Existing Buildings; 26                (G) UL 3223; or   SB2290- 4 -LRB104 05890 HLH 15921 b1                (H) an equivalent program approved by the 2            Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 3        "Full-time equivalent job" means a job in which the 4    new employee works for the owner, operator, contractor, or 5    tenant of a data center or for a corporation under 6    contract with the owner, operator or tenant of a data 7    center at a rate of at least 35 hours per week. An owner, 8    operator or tenant who employs labor or services at a 9    specific site or facility under contract with another may 10    declare one full-time, permanent job for every 1,820 man 11    hours worked per year under that contract. Vacations, paid 12    holidays, and sick time are included in this computation. 13    Overtime is not considered a part of regular hours. 14        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 15    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 16    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 17    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 18    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 19    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 20    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 21    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 22    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 23    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 24    systems; other cabling; and other data center 25    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 26    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures;   SB2290- 5 -LRB104 05890 HLH 15921 b1    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 2    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 3    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 4    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 5    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 6    personal property; and all other tangible personal 7    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 8    data center. "Qualified tangible personal property" also 9    includes building materials physically incorporated in to 10    the qualifying data center.11        "Quantum research facility" means (i) a structure or 12    building used specifically for quantum research or 13    advanced computing or defense, (ii) the qualified 14    equipment that is placed in the structure or building, or 15    (iii) one or more quantum capable fiber networks along 16    with any structures and personal property contained on the 17    land that are required to operate a quantum capable fiber 18    network either at a single location or at multiple 19    distributed locations that are specifically used for 20    quantum research, advanced computing, or the defense 21    infrastructure. 22    To document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 23retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 24certificate of eligibility issued by the Department. 25    (d) New and existing data centers seeking a certificate of 26exemption for new or existing facilities shall apply to the   SB2290- 6 -LRB104 05890 HLH 15921 b1Department in the manner specified by the Department. The 2Department shall determine the duration of the certificate of 3exemption awarded under this Act. The duration of the 4certificate of exemption may not exceed 20 calendar years. The 5Department and any data center seeking the exemption, 6including a data center operator on behalf of itself and its 7tenants, must enter into a memorandum of understanding that at 8a minimum provides: 9        (1) the details for determining the amount of capital 10    investment to be made; 11        (2) the number of new jobs created; 12        (3) the timeline for achieving the capital investment 13    and new job goals; 14        (4) the repayment obligation should those goals not be 15    achieved and any conditions under which repayment by the 16    qualifying data center or data center tenant claiming the 17    exemption will be required; 18        (5) the duration of the exemption; and 19        (6) other provisions as deemed necessary by the 20    Department. 21    (e) Beginning July 1, 2021, and each year thereafter, the 22Department shall annually report to the Governor and the 23General Assembly on the outcomes and effectiveness of Public 24Act 101-31 that shall include the following: 25        (1) the name of each recipient business; 26        (2) the location of the project;   SB2290- 7 -LRB104 05890 HLH 15921 b1        (3) the estimated value of the credit; 2        (4) the number of new jobs and, if applicable, 3    retained jobs pledged as a result of the project; and 4        (5) whether or not the project is located in an 5    underserved area.6    (f) New and existing data centers seeking a certificate of 7exemption related to the rehabilitation or construction of 8data centers in the State shall require the contractor and all 9subcontractors to comply with the requirements of Section 1030-22 of the Illinois Procurement Code as they apply to 11responsible bidders and to present satisfactory evidence of 12that compliance to the Department. 13    (g) New and existing data centers seeking a certificate of 14exemption for the rehabilitation or construction of data 15centers in the State shall require the contractor to enter 16into a project labor agreement approved by the Department.17    (h) Any qualifying data center issued a certificate of 18exemption under this Section must annually report to the 19Department the total data center tax benefits that are 20received by the business. Reports are due no later than May 31 21of each year and shall cover the previous calendar year. The 22first report is for the 2019 calendar year and is due no later 23than May 31, 2020. 24    To the extent that a business issued a certificate of 25exemption under this Section has obtained an Enterprise Zone 26Building Materials Exemption Certificate or a High Impact   SB2290- 8 -LRB104 05890 HLH 15921 b1Business Building Materials Exemption Certificate, no 2additional reporting for those building materials exemption 3benefits is required under this Section. 4    Failure to file a report under this subsection (h) may 5result in suspension or revocation of the certificate of 6exemption. Factors to be considered in determining whether a 7data center certificate of exemption shall be suspended or 8revoked include, but are not limited to, prior compliance with 9the reporting requirements, cooperation in discontinuing and 10correcting violations, the extent of the violation, and 11whether the violation was willful or inadvertent. 12    (i) The Department shall not issue any new certificates of 13exemption under the provisions of this Section after July 1, 142029. This sunset shall not affect any existing certificates 15of exemption in effect on July 1, 2029. 16    (j) The Department shall adopt rules to implement and 17administer this Section. 18(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-604, eff. 12-13-19; 19102-427, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.)